Nebraska, session 109, LB1087.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) There is hereby established the Nebraska-Ireland
Commission.
(2) The commission shall consist of the following members:
(a) The Director of the Department of Agriculture or the director's
designee;
(b) The Director of the Department of Economic Development or the
director's designee;
(c) A representative of a Nebraska postsecondary educational institution
to be appointed by the Governor;
(d) Two representatives from a Nebraska business association such as a
trade organization, economic development organization, or chamber of commerce
appointed by the Governor;
(e) A representative of a Nebraska nonprofit organization offering child
and family services and community programs and interested in enhancing
relationships between Nebraska and Ireland, including furthering trade,
appointed by the Governor;
(f) A member of the public who is interested in enhancing relationships
between Nebraska and Ireland, including furthering trade, appointed by the
Governor; and
(g) Three members of the Nebraska Legislature, one from each of the
Congressional districts, who shall serve as nonvoting, ex officio members
appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council.
(3) Each member shall serve for a term of two years and may be reappointed
without limit. If a position becomes vacant, such position must be filled for
the duration of the term in the same manner as the original appointment.
(4) Members shall serve on the commission without compensation but may be
compensated for expenses incurred in the performance of official duties as
provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 if funds are available.
(5) The commission shall elect a chairperson and vice-chairperson from
among its members. The commission shall hold meetings at least once each
quarter at the call of the chairperson. The committee may conduct its meetings
by virtual conferencing as defined in section 84-1409. A majority of the
members shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of the business of the
commission.
(6) The purpose of the Nebraska-Ireland Commission shall be to advance,
promote, and encourage business and other mutually beneficial activities
between Nebraska and Ireland, including:
(a) Bilateral trade and investment;
(b) Joint action on policy issues of mutual interest;
(c) Business and academic exchanges;
(d) Mutual economic support between Nebraska and Ireland;
(e) Mutual investment in the infrastructure of Nebraska and Ireland; and
(f) Other issues as determined by the commission.
(7) For administrative and budgetary purposes, the commission shall be
housed within the Department of Economic Development. Additional support to
facilitate the work of the commission may be requested from appropriate federal
and state agencies and other stakeholders as appropriate.
(8) The Nebraska-Ireland Fund is hereby established. The Department of
Economic Development shall administer the fund. The purpose of the fund is to
defray the administrative expenses of the commission and to support the
commission's efforts to carry out its purposes. The fund shall consist of
transfers authorized by the Legislature, funds raised by or on behalf of the
commission, funds from the federal government, gifts, grants, and funds from
other sources. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act
and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Investment earnings from
investment money in the fund shall be credited to the fund.
(9) On or before December 1, 2027, and on or before December 31 of each
year thereafter, the commission shall submit an annual report to the Governor
and the Legislature containing the commission's findings, results, and
recommendations. The report submitted to the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically.
-1-